Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-904
Recognizance; deposit with clerk; discharge of prisoner.

In all cases when a judge or examining court shall recognize a prisoner under the provisions of the three sections 29-901, 29-902, and 29-903, he shall forthwith deposit with the clerk of the proper court the recognizance so taken, and also a warrant directed to the jailer requiring him to discharge the prisoner.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 349, p. 803;

R.S.1913, § 9006;

C.S.1922, § 10030;

C.S.1929, § 29-904;

R.S.1943, § 29-904.